Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 3
CHILD CARE LICENSING

26.5-5-301. Short title.

The short title of this part 3 is the "Child Care Licensing Act".

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 719, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-302. Legislative declaration concerning the protections afforded by regulation.

The general assembly finds and declares that increasing numbers of children in Colorado are spending a significant portion of their day in care settings outside their own homes. The general assembly finds that regulation and licensing of child care facilities contribute to a safe and healthy environment for children. The provision of such environment affords benefits to children, their families, their communities, and the larger society. The general assembly acknowledges that there is a need to balance accessibility and quality of care when regulating child care facilities. It is the intent of the general assembly that those who regulate and those who are regulated work together to meet the needs of the children, their families, and the child care industry.

In balancing the needs of children and their families with the needs of the child care industry, the general assembly also recognizes the financial demands with which the department is faced in its attempt to ensure a safe and sanitary environment for those children of the state of Colorado who are in child care facilities. In an effort to reduce the risk to children outside their homes while recognizing the financial constraints placed upon the department, it is the intent of the general assembly that the limited resources available be focused primarily on those child care facilities that have demonstrated that children in their care may be at higher risk pursuant to section 26.5-5-316.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 719, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-101.4 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-303. Definitions - repeal.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affiliate of a licensee" means:

Any person or entity that owns more than five percent of the ownership interest in the business operated by the licensee or the applicant for a license; or

Any person who is directly responsible for the care and welfare of children served; or

Any executive, officer, member of the governing board, or employee of a licensee; or

A relative of a licensee, which relative provides care to children at the licensee's facility or is otherwise involved in the management or operations of the licensee's facility.

"Application" means a declaration of intent to obtain or continue a license for a child care facility.

"Child care center", prior to July 1, 2024, means a facility, by whatever name known, that is maintained for the whole or part of a day for the care of five or more children, unless otherwise specified in this subsection (3)(a)(I), who are eighteen years of age or younger and who are not related to the owner, operator, or manager thereof, whether the facility is operated with or without compensation for such care and with or without stated educational purposes. The term includes, but is not limited to, facilities commonly known as child care centers, school-age child care centers, before- and after-school programs, kindergartens, preschools, day camps, and summer camps and includes those facilities for children under six years of age with stated educational purposes operated in conjunction with a public, private, or parochial college or a private or parochial school; except that the term does not apply to any kindergarten maintained in connection with a public, private, or parochial elementary school system of at least six grades.
(3) (a) (I) "Child care center", prior to July 1, 2024, means a facility, by whatever name known, that is maintained for the whole or part of a day for the care of five or more children, unless otherwise specified in this subsection (3)(a)(I), who are eighteen years of age or younger and who are not related to the owner, operator, or manager thereof, whether the facility is operated with or without compensation for such care and with or without stated educational purposes. The term includes, but is not limited to, facilities commonly known as child care centers, school-age child care centers, before- and after-school programs, kindergartens, preschools, day camps, and summer camps and includes those facilities for children under six years of age with stated educational purposes operated in conjunction with a public, private, or parochial college or a private or parochial school; except that the term does not apply to any kindergarten maintained in connection with a public, private, or parochial elementary school system of at least six grades.

This subsection (3)(a) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

"Child care center", on and after July 1, 2024, means a facility, by whatever name known, that is maintained for the whole or part of a day for the care of five or more children, unless otherwise specified in this subsection (3)(b), who are eighteen years of age or younger and who are not related to the owner, operator, or manager thereof, whether the facility is operated with or without compensation for such care and with or without stated educational purposes. The term includes, but is not limited to, facilities commonly known as child care centers, school-age child care centers, before- and after-school programs, kindergartens, preschools, day camps, and summer camps, and includes those facilities for children under six years of age with stated educational purposes operated in conjunction with a public, private, or parochial college or a private or parochial school; except that the term does not apply to any kindergarten maintained in connection with a public, private, or parochial elementary school system of at least six grades.

"Child care provider", as used in section 26.5-5-325, means a licensee, or an affiliate of a licensee, when the licensee holds a license to operate a family child care home pursuant to this part 3.

"Children's resident camp" means a facility operating for three or more consecutive twenty-four-hour days during one or more seasons of the year for the care of five or more children. The facility has as its purpose a group living experience offering education and recreational activities in an outdoor environment. The recreational experiences may occur at the permanent camp premises or on trips off the premises.

A children's resident camp serves children who have completed kindergarten or are six years of age or older through children younger than nineteen years of age; except that a person nineteen years of age or twenty years of age may attend a children's resident camp if, within six months prior to attending the children's resident camp, the person has attended or has graduated from high school.

"Exempt family child care home provider" means a family child care home provider who is exempt from certain provisions of this part 3 pursuant to section 26.5-5-304 (1)(f).

"Family child care home" means a facility for child care operated with or without compensation or educational purposes in a place of residence of a family or person for the purpose of providing less than twenty-four-hour care for children under the age of eighteen years who are not related to the head of such home. "Family child care home" may include infant-toddler child care homes, large child care homes, experienced provider child care homes, and such other types of family child care homes designated by department rules pursuant to section 26.5-5-314 (2)(n), as the executive director deems necessary and appropriate.

"Governing body" means the individual, partnership, corporation, or association in which the ultimate authority and legal responsibility is vested for the administration and operation of a child care facility.

"Guardian" means a person who is entrusted by law with the care of a child under eighteen years of age.

"Guest child care facility" means a facility operated by a ski area, as that term is defined in section 33-44-103 (6), where children are cared for:

While parents or persons in charge of such child are patronizing the ski area;

Fewer than ten total hours per day;

Fewer than ten consecutive days per year; and

Fewer than forty-five days in a calendar year, with thirty or fewer of such forty-five days occurring in either the winter or summer months.

"ICON" means the computerized database of court records known as the integrated Colorado online network used by the state judicial department.

"Kindergarten" means any facility providing an educational program for children only for the year preceding their entrance to the first grade, whether such facility is called a kindergarten, nursery school, preschool, or any other name.

"License" means a legal document issued pursuant to this part 3 granting permission to operate a child care facility. A license may be in the form of a provisional, probationary, permanent, or time-limited license.

"Licensee" means the entity or individual to which a license is issued and that has the legal capacity to enter into an agreement or contract, assume obligations, incur and pay debts, sue and be sued in its own right, and be held responsible for its actions. A licensee may be a governing body.

"Licensing" means the process by which the department approves a facility for the purpose of conducting business as a child care facility.

"Negative licensing action" means a final agency action resulting in the denial of an application, the imposition of fines, or the suspension or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this part 3 or the demotion of such a license to a probationary license.

As used in this subsection (16), "final agency action" means the determination made by the department, after an opportunity for a hearing, to deny, suspend, revoke, or demote to probationary status a license issued pursuant to this part 3 or an agreement between the department and the licensee concerning the demotion of such a license to a probationary license.

"Neighborhood youth organization" means a nonprofit organization that provides programs and services, as described in section 26-6-103.7, to children, youth, and families through comprehensive wraparound supports to ensure positive growth and development during childhood and adolescence, and is designed to serve youth as young as five years of age who are enrolled in kindergarten and as old as eighteen years of age.

A neighborhood youth organization does not include faith-based centers, organizations or programs operated by state or city parks or special districts, or departments or facilities that are currently licensed as child care centers.

(17.5) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 501, as amended.

"Occasional care" means care of children, with or without compensation, that is provided on an infrequent and irregular basis with no apparent pattern.

"Person" means any corporation, partnership, association, firm, agency, institution, or individual.

"Place of residence" means the place or abode where a person actually lives and provides child care.

"Public preschool provider" means a school district, or a charter school authorized pursuant to article 30.5 of title 22, that provides a preschool program.

"Public services short-term child care facility" means a facility that is operated by or for a county department of human or social services or a court and that provides care for a child:

While the child's parent or the person in charge of the child is conducting business with the county department of human or social services or participating in court proceedings;

Fewer than ten total hours per day;

Fewer than fifteen consecutive days per year; and

Fewer than forty-five days in a calendar year.

"Related" means any of the following relationships by blood, marriage, or adoption: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or cousin.

"Relative" means any of the following relationships by blood, marriage, or adoption: Parent, grandparent, son, daughter, grandson, granddaughter, brother, sister, stepparent, stepbrother, stepsister, stepson, stepdaughter, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or cousin.

"Routine medications", as used in section 26.5-5-325, means any prescribed oral, topical, or inhaled medication, or unit dose epinephrine, that is administered pursuant to section 26.5-5-325.

"Sibling" means one or more individuals having one or both parents in common.

"Substitute child care provider" means a person who provides temporary care for a child or children in a licensed child care facility, including a child care center and a family child care home.

"Substitute placement agency" means any corporation, partnership, association, firm, agency, or institution that places or that facilitates or arranges placement of short-term or long-term substitute child care providers in licensed child care facilities providing less than twenty-four-hour care.

"Supervisory employee" means, as used in section 26.5-5-307:

A person directly responsible for managing a guest child care facility and the employees of the facility; or

A person directly responsible for managing a public services short-term child care facility and the employees of the facility.

"Youth member" means a youth who is five years of age and enrolled in kindergarten or who is older than five years of age and up to eighteen years of age whose parent or legal guardian has provided written consent for the youth to participate in the activities of a neighborhood youth organization.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 719, § 3, effective July 1; (17)(a), and (30) amended with relocations and (17.5) added with relocations (SB 22-064), ch. 22, p. 144, § 1, effective March 17.

26.5-5-304. Application of part - definition - repeal.

This part 3 does not apply to:

Special schools or classes operated primarily for religious instruction or for a single skill-building purpose, as defined in department rule;

A child care facility that is approved, certified, or licensed by any other state agency, or by a federal government department or agency, that has standards for operation of the facility and inspects or monitors the facility;

Facilities operated in connection with a church, shopping center, or business where children are cared for during short periods of time while parents, persons in charge of such children, or employees of the church, shopping center, or business whose children are being cared for at such location are attending church services at such location or shopping, patronizing, or working on the premises of any such business;

Occasional care of children that has no apparent pattern and occurs with or without compensation;

The care of a child by a person in the person's private residence when the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of such child gives consent to such care and when the person giving such care is not regularly engaged in the business of giving such care; or

An individual who provides less than twenty-four-hour child care in a place of residence when one of the following conditions is met:

The children being cared for are related to the caregiver, are children who are related to each other as siblings from a single family that is unrelated to the caregiver, or a combination of such children; or

There are no more than four children being cared for, with no more than two children under two years of age from multiple families, regardless of the children's relation to the caregiver.

An individual providing child care in a place of residence authorized pursuant to subsection (1)(f)(I) of this section shall notify the parents of the children in the individual's care that the individual is operating under a legal license exemption and that the state has not verified the health and safety of the care setting or performed background checks on the individual or anyone else residing in the residence.

On or before July 1, 2021, and every year thereafter, the department shall report the number of complaints filed against child care providers who are claiming an exemption from licensing pursuant to subsection (1)(f)(I)(B) of this section.

This subsection (1)(f) is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.

As used in this section, "short periods of time" means fewer than three hours in any twenty-four-hour period.

A licensee or governing body that has had its license suspended pursuant to section 24-4-104 or has received a final agency action resulting in the revocation of a license issued pursuant to this part 3 is prohibited from operating pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, except when the children being cared for are related to the caregiver.

The department shall provide education and information in an accessible manner on the state licensing website for child care providers who are exempt pursuant to this section but are interested in becoming a licensed child care provider.

On or before December 31, 2021, and ongoing thereafter, the department shall report on the portion of its state child care provider website that is accessible to families, and in an accessible and prominent manner, the name and location of any child care provider who is operating outside the exemptions described in this section and to whom one or more cease-and-desist orders have been issued. If more than one cease-and-desist order has been issued to the same provider, the website must include the total number of such orders. This requirement for website posting for child care providers who are operating outside the exemptions described in this section must be made public by electronic means, in a consumer-friendly and easily accessible format, organized by provider, and include the date or dates of the cease-and-desist order or orders.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 728, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6-103 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-5-305. Public preschool provider - licensing - rules.

Public preschool providers are subject to the requirements of this part 3. Because of the unique circumstances presented by preschool classrooms provided by school districts and charter schools, which circumstances do not arise in classrooms for older children and youth, the department shall license public preschool providers only to protect the health and safety of children in public preschool classrooms. Notwithstanding any provision of this part 3 to the contrary, licensing for public preschool providers must focus only on those aspects of the preschool program and environment that affect children's health and safety and are not already actively regulated by other federal or state agencies or departments. The department shall align any requirements for the license related to qualifications or credentialing of program staff with the requirements for an early childhood endorsement for a license issued by the department of education pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 730, § 3, effective July 1.

26.5-5-306. Substitute child care providers - substitute placement agency - licensing - rules.

Substitute placement agencies are subject to the requirements of this part 3. The department shall license substitute placement agencies to place or facilitate or arrange for the placement of short-term and long-term substitute child care providers in licensed facilities providing less than twenty-four-hour care.

The executive director shall promulgate rules for substitute placement agencies and substitute child care providers. At a minimum, the rules must require that the substitute child care provider demonstrate that the provider has the training and certification for the child care license type and position in which the substitute child care provider is placed. Pursuant to section 26.5-5-316 (1)(a)(I)(C), each substitute child care provider shall pay for and submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history record check and a review of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department of human services to determine whether the substitute child care provider has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect. When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check or any other records check performed on a person pursuant to this subsection (2) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the department rules shall require that person to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). The substitute placement agency shall not place a substitute child care provider who is convicted of any of the crimes specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4) or 26.5-5-317.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 730, § 3, effective July 1; (2) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 530, § 46, effective April 21.

26.5-5-307. Application of part - guest child care facilities - public services short-term child care facilities - definition.

Guest child care facilities and public services short-term child care facilities are subject only to the requirements of this section and are otherwise excluded from the requirements of this part 3. Each guest child care facility and each public services short-term child care facility shall post a notice in bold print and in plain view on the premises of the child care facility. The notice must specify the telephone number and address of the appropriate division within the department for investigating child care facility complaints and must state that any complaint about the guest child care facility's or the public services short-term child care facility's compliance with these requirements should be directed to such division.

A person or entity shall not operate a guest child care facility or a public services short-term child care facility unless the following requirements are met:

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility is inspected not less frequently than one time per year by the department of public health and environment, and it conforms to the sanitary standards prescribed by such department under the provisions of section 25-1.5-101 (1)(h);

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility is inspected not less frequently than one time per year by the local fire department, and it conforms to the fire prevention and protection requirements of the local fire department in the locality of the facility, or in lieu thereof, the division of labor standards and statistics;

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility retains, on the premises at all times, the records of the inspections required by subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b) of this section for the current calendar year and the immediately preceding calendar year;

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility retains, on the premises at all times, a record of children cared for over the course of the current calendar year and the immediately preceding calendar year;

At least one supervisory employee is on duty at the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility at all times when the facility is operating;

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requires all supervisory employees of the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility and applicants for supervisory employee positions at the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history check utilizing the Colorado bureau of investigation and, for supervisory employees hired on or after August 10, 2011, the federal bureau of investigation and requests the department to ascertain whether the person being investigated has been convicted of any of the criminal offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(I) or whether the person has been determined to have a pattern of misdemeanor convictions as described in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(I)(F) and the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility prohibits the hiring of any such person as a supervisory employee or terminates the employment of any such person as a supervisory employee upon confirmation of such a criminal history;

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requests the department to access records and reports of child abuse or neglect to determine whether the supervisory employee or applicant for a supervisory employee position has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect and the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility prohibits the hiring of any such person as a supervisory employee or terminates the employment of any such person as a supervisory employee. Information shall be made available pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(r) and rules promulgated by the state board of human services pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (4).

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requests the department to obtain a comparison search on the ICON system at the state judicial department with the name and date of birth information and any other available source of criminal history information that the department determines is appropriate, whether or not the criminal history background check confirms a criminal history, in order to determine the crime or crimes, if any, for which the supervisory employee or applicant for a supervisory employee position was arrested or convicted and the disposition thereof; and

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requests the department to obtain such information concerning the supervisory employee or applicant for a supervisory employee position from any other recognized database, if any, that is accessible on a statewide basis as set forth by rules promulgated by the executive director;

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check or any other records check performed pursuant to this subsection (2)(f) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility shall require the supervisory employee or applicant for a supervisory employee position to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d);

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requires all other employees of the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history check utilizing the Colorado bureau of investigation and, for employees hired on or after August 10, 2011, the federal bureau of investigation and requests the department to ascertain whether the person being investigated has been convicted of any of the criminal offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(I) or whether the person has been determined to have a pattern of misdemeanor convictions as described in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(I)(F) and the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility terminates the employment of any such person as an employee upon confirmation of such a criminal history;

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requests the department to access records and reports of child abuse or neglect to determine whether the employee has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect and the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility terminates the employment of any such person. Information shall be made available pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(r) and rules promulgated by the state board of human services pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (4).

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requests the department to obtain a comparison search on the ICON system at the state judicial department with the name and date of birth information and any other available source of criminal history information that the department determines is appropriate, whether or not the criminal history background check confirms a criminal history, in order to determine the crime or crimes, if any, for which the employee was arrested or convicted and the disposition thereof; and

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility requests the department to obtain such information concerning the employee from any other recognized database, if any, that is accessible on a statewide basis as set forth by rules promulgated by the executive director; and

The guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility maintains the following employee-to-child ratios at all times when the facility is operating:

One child care facility employee for every five children ages six weeks to eighteen months;

One child care facility employee for every five children ages twelve months to thirty-six months;

One child care facility employee for every seven children ages twenty-four months to thirty-six months;

One child care facility employee for every eight children ages two and one-half years to three years;

One child care facility employee for every ten children ages three years to four years;

One child care facility employee for every twelve children ages four years to five years;

One child care facility employee for every fifteen children ages five years of age and older; and

One child care facility employee for every ten children in a mixed age group, ages two and one-half years to six years.

In addition to the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section, a public services short-term child care facility shall ensure that at least one employee is on duty at the facility at all times when the facility is operating who holds a current department-approved first aid and safety certificate that includes certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation training for all ages of children.

If the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility refuses to hire a supervisory employee or terminates the employment of a supervisory employee as a result of information disclosed in an investigation of the supervisory employee or applicant for a supervisory position pursuant to subsection (2)(f) of this section, the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility shall not be subject to civil liability for such refusal to hire.

If the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility terminates the employment of an employee as a result of the information disclosed in an investigation of the employee pursuant to subsection (2)(g) of this section, the guest child care facility or public services short-term child care facility shall not be subject to civil liability for such termination of employment.

A guest child care facility employee or supervisory employee applicant who has obtained a fingerprint-based criminal history check pursuant to subsection (2)(f) or (2)(g) of this section, or pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, is not required to obtain a new fingerprint-based criminal history check if the employee or applicant returns to a guest child care facility to work in subsequent seasons. The department shall maintain the results of the initial background check and receive subsequent notification of activity on the record for the purpose of redetermining, if necessary, whether the employee or supervisory employee applicant has been convicted of any of the criminal offenses specified in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(I), or whether the employee or supervisory employee applicant has a pattern of misdemeanor convictions as described in section 26.5-5-309 (4)(a)(I)(F), and the guest child care facility shall contact the department for information concerning subsequent convictions, if any, prior to rehiring such employee.

The requirements of subsections (2)(f) and (2)(g) of this section do not apply to those employees of guest child care facilities concerning whom criminal history background checks were conducted on or after July 1, 2001, and before July 1, 2002, for purposes of state child care licensure requirements.

As used in this section, a "guest child care facility" does not include a ski school. As used in this section, "ski school" means a school located at the ski area in which the guest child care facility is located for purposes of teaching children how to ski or snowboard.

The department is authorized to receive, respond to, and investigate any complaint concerning compliance with the requirements set forth in this part 3 for a guest child care facility or a public services short-term child care facility.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 730, § 3, effective July 1; (2)(f)(IV) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 530, § 47, effective April 21.